Hawaii, session 2026, HB2461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public art is a powerful tool for cultural preservation, community identity, and placemaking.  Through the state foundation on culture and the arts' commissioned works of art program, Hawaii ensures that public spaces reflect the State's unique multicultural heritage, history, and values, while supporting local artists and strengthening the creative economy. The legislature further finds that the state foundation on culture and the arts is currently updating its communications and dissemination protocols to increase awareness of the commissioned works of art program among state departments and other stakeholders.  As a result of this outreach, the foundation anticipates increased requests for commissioned works of art from state agencies, including schools, libraries, and other public facilities. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Increase the ceiling of the works of art special fund to allow the state foundation on culture and the arts to fulfill current and projected requests for commissioned works of art; (2)  Appropriate funds for the maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of the State's public art and collections; and (3)  Establish a collections manager position within the state foundation on culture and the arts. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the works of art special fund the sum of $2,300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the commissioning and acquisition of works of arts for display in state buildings and spaces for public enjoyment and enrichment. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,700,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a capital improvement project lump sum appropriation for maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of the State's public art and collections, including conservation services, expert curatorial care, and environmental controls necessary to prevent deterioration and preservation of the State's cultural and historical assets for current and future generations. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $106,548 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent collections manager position. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________